Connecticut, session 2026, HB05392.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 7-148l of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 Any person aggrieved by any order of the board, commission,
4 council, committee or other agency established or designated pursuant
5 to sections 7-148i to 7-148n, inclusive, and subparagraph (B) of
6 subdivision (9) of subsection (c) of section 7-148 may appeal to the State
7 Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities. Any such appeal
8 shall be filed [within] not later than thirty days [of] after the mailing of
9 the written decision.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148l
PD Joint Favorable
HB5392 / File No. 262 1

HB5392 File No. 262
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes technical changes and does not result in a fiscal
impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5392 / File No. 262 2

HB5392 File No. 262
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5392
AN ACT CONCERNING MUNICIPAL AGENCIES.